hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta kulinarskog termometra: Termometar za slatkiše/prženje u dubokom ulju; Termometar sa sondom; Digitalni termometar sa sondom; Termometar za hladnjake/zamrzivače; Infracrveni termometar; Tremometar s trenutnim očitavanjem; Termometar za meso; Termometar za pećnicu; Bežični termometar sa sondom; Ostalo
es: Tipo de termómetro de cocina compatible: Termómetro para dulces y frituras; Termómetro de aguja; Termómetro digital; Termómetro para frigorífico/congelador; Termómetro infrarrojos; Termómetro de lectura instantánea; Termómetro para carne; Termómetro de horno; Termómetro de sonda inalámbrico; Otros
hu: Kompatibilis főzőhőmérő típusa: Cukor-/sütőhőmérő; Tárcsás szondás hőmérő; Digitális szondás hőmérő; Hűtőszekrény-/fagyasztóhőmérő; Infravörös hőmérő; Azonnal leolvasható hőmérő; Húshőmérő; Sütőhőmérő; Vezeték nélküli szondás hőmérő; Egyéb
el: Συμβατός τύπος θερμομέτρου μαγειρικής: Θερμόμετρο ζαχαροπλαστικής / τηγανίσματος; Αναλογικό θερμόμετρο με ακίδα; Ψηφιακό θερμόμετρο με ακίδα; Θερμόμετρο ψυγείου/καταψύκτη; Υπέρυθρο θερμόμετρο; Θερμόμετρο άμεσης ανάγνωσης; Θερμόμετρο κρέατος; Θερμόμετρο φούρνου; Ασύρματο θερμόμετρο με ακίδα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим тип термометър за готвене: Термометър за бонбони/пържене; Термометър с циферблат и сонда; Дигитален термометър със сонда; Термометър за хладилник/фризер; Инфрачервен термометър; Термометър с незабавно отчитане; Термометър за месо; Термометър за фурна; Безжичен термометър със сонда; Друго
pl: Kompatybilny typ termometru kuchennego: Termometr cukierniczy / do smażenia; Termometr analogowy z sondą; Termometr cyfrowy z sondą; Termometr do lodówki / zamrażarki; Termometr na podczerwień; Termometr z natychmiastowym odczytem; Termometr do mięsa; Termometr do piekarnika; Bezprzewodowy termometr z sondą; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 兼容的烹饪温度计类型: 糖果/油炸温度计; 表盘探针温度计; 数字探针温度计; 冰箱/冰柜温度计; 红外温度计; 速读温度计; 肉类温度计; 烤箱温度计; 无线探针温度计; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de termômetro de cozinha compatível: Termômetro para doces/frituras; Termômetro de sonda de mostrador; Termômetro de sonda digital; Termômetro para geladeira/congelador; Termômetros infravermelhos; Termômetro de leitura instantânea; Termômetro de carne; Termômetro para forno; Termômetro de sonda sem fio; Outro
it: Tipo di termometro da cucina compatibile: Termometro per dolciumi/fritture; Termometro a sonda a quadrante; Termometro digitale a sonda; Termometro per frigorifero/congelatore; Termometro a infrarossi; Termometro a lettura istantanea; Termometro per carne; Termometro da forno; Termometro a sonda wireless; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de termometru de gătit compatibil: Termometru pentru bomboane/prăjire; Termometru cu cadran și sondă; Termometru digital cu sondă; Termometru pentru frigider/congelator; Termometru cu infraroșu; Termometru cu citire instantanee; Termometru pentru carne; Termometru de cuptor; Termometru wireless cu sondă; Altele
ru: Совместимый тип кулинарного термометра: Термометр для кондитерских изделий/фритюра; Циферблатный термометр с щупом; Цифровой термометр с щупом; Термометр для холодильника/морозильника; Инфракрасный термометр; Быстродействующий термометр; Термометр для мяса; Термометр для духовых шкафов; Беспроводной термометр с щупом; Другой
ko: 호환 조리용 온도계 유형: 캔디/튀김용 온도계; 다이얼 프로브 온도계; 디지털 프로브 온도계; 냉장고/냉동고 온도계; 적외선 온도계; 식품 온도계; 고기 온도계; 오븐 온도계; 무선 프로브 온도계; 기타
ja: 対応調理用温度計タイプ: キャンディ/揚げ物用温度計; ダイヤルプローブ温度計; デジタルプローブ温度計; 冷蔵庫/冷凍庫用温度計; 赤外線式温度計; 瞬時読み取り温度計; 肉用温度計; オーブン用温度計; ワイヤレスプローブ温度計; その他
lt-LT: Suderinamas maisto termometro tipas: Saldainių / gruzdintuvės termometras; Zondinis termometras su ratuku; Skaitmeninis zondo termometras; Šaldytuvo / šaldiklio termometras; Infraraudonųjų spindulių termometras; Momentinis termometras; Mėsos termometras; Orkaitės termometras; Belaidis zondo termometras; Kita
cs: Kompatibilní typ kuchyňského teploměru: Cukrářský/fritovací teploměr; Analogový vpichovací teploměr; Digitální vpichovací teploměr; Teploměr do chladničky/mrazáku; Infračervený teploměr; Teploměr s okamžitým odečtem; Teploměr na maso; Teploměr do trouby; Bezdrátový vpichovací teploměr; Jiné
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ kuchynského teplomeru: Teplomer na cukrovinky/fritovanie; Potravinársky ihlový teplomer; Digitálny ihlový teplomer; Teplomer do chladničky/mrazničky; Infračervený teplomer; Teplomer s okamžitým odčítaním; Teplomer na mäso; Teplomer do rúry; Bezdrôtový ihlový teplomer; Iné
fi: Yhteensopiva ruoanlaittolämpömittarin tyyppi: Sokeri-/friteerauslämpömittari; Analoginen lämpömittari; Digitaalinen lämpömittari; Jääkaapin/pakastimen lämpömittari; Infrapunalämpömittari; Reaaliaikainen lämpömittari; Paistilämpömittari; Uunin lämpömittari; Langaton anturilämpömittari; Muu
vi: Loại nhiệt kế nấu ăn tương thích: Nhiệt kế đo kẹo/đồ chiên sâu; Nhiệt kế đầu dò dạng mặt số; Nhiệt kế đầu dò kỹ thuật số; Nhiệt kế tủ lạnh/tủ đông; Nhiệt kế hồng ngoại; Nhiệt kế đọc tức thì; Nhiệt kế đo thịt; Nhiệt kế lò nướng; Nhiệt kế đầu dò không dây; Khác
de: Kompatibler Kochthermometertyp: Zucker-/Frittierthermometer; Zeiger-Sondenthermometer; Digitales Sondenthermometer; Kühlschrank-/Gefrierschrankthermometer; Infrarotthermometer; Sofort ablesbares Thermometer; Fleischthermometer; Ofenthermometer; Drahtloses Sondenthermometer; Sonstiges
nl: Compatibel type kookthermometer: Suiker-/frituurthermometer; Analoge sonde-thermometer; Digitale sonde-thermometer; Koelkast-/vriezerthermometer; Infraroodthermometer; Direct afleesbare thermometer; Vleesthermometer; Oventhermometer; Draadloze sonde-thermometer; Overig
th: ประเภทเทอร์โมมิเตอร์อาหารที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิน้ำเชื่อมร้อน/น้ำมันร้อน; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิแบบโพรบหน้าปัด; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิแบบโพรบดิจิทัล; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิตู้เย็น/ช่องแช่แข็ง; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์แบบอินฟราเรด; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์แบบอ่านค่าได้ทันที; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิเนื้อสัตว์; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์วัดอุณหภูมิเตาอบ; เครื่องวัดอุณหภูมิแบบโพรบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta kuhinjskega termometra: Termometer za sladkarije/cvrtje; Termometer s številčnico; Digitalni termometer s sondo; Termometer za hladilnik/zamrzovalnik; Infrardeči termometer; Termometer s takojšnjim odčitavanjem; Termometer za meso; Termometer za pečico; Brezžični termometer s sondo; Druga
da: Kompatibelt madlavningstermometer: Slik-/frituretermometer; Termometer med drejeskive; Termometer med digital føler; Køleskabs-/frysetermometer; Infrarødt termometer; Øjeblikkeligt termometer; Termometer til kød; Ovntermometer; Termometer med trådløs føler; Andet
tr: Uyumlu pişirme termometresi tipi: Şekerleme/Kızartma termometresi; Kadranlı prob termometresi; Dijital prob termometresi; Buzdolabı/Dondurucu termometresi; Kızılötesi termometre; Hızlı termometre; Et termometresi; Fırın termometresi; Kablosuz prob termometresi; Diğer
en: Compatible cooking thermometer type: Candy/Deep-fry thermometer; Dial probe thermometer; Digital probe thermometer; Fridge/Freezer thermometer; Infrared thermometer; Instant-read thermometer; Meat thermometer; Oven thermometer; Wireless probe thermometer; Other
fr: Type de thermomètre de cuisson compatible: Thermomètre à confiserie/friture; Thermomètre à cadran; Thermomètre à sonde numérique; Thermomètre pour réfrigérateur/congélateur; Thermomètre infrarouge; Thermomètre à lecture instantanée; Thermomètre à viande; Thermomètre de four; Thermomètre à sonde sans fil; Autre
zh-TW: 相容烹飪溫度計類型: 煮糖/油炸用溫度計; 探針式溫度計; 數位探針溫度計; 冷藏/冷凍溫度計; 紅外線溫度計; 即時讀取溫度計; 肉類溫度計; 烤箱溫度計; 無線探針式溫度計; 其他
nb: Kompatibel type matlagingstermometer: Godteri-/frityrtermometer; Termometer med skruprobe; Digitalt sondetermometer; Kjøleskaps-/frysetermometer; Infrarøde termometere; Termometer med øyeblikkelig avlesning; Kjøtttermometer; Ovnstermometer; Trådløst sondetermometer; Annet
sv: Typ av kompatibel matlagningstermometer: Socker-/friteringstermometer; Analog termometer med sond; Digital sondtermometer; Kyl-/frystermometer; Infraröda termometrar; Termometer med direktavläsning; Kötttermometer; Ugnstermometer; Trådlös sondtermometer; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de termómetro de cozinha compatível: Termómetro para doces/frituras; Termómetro de sonda com mostrador; Termómetro de sonda digital; Termómetro para frigorífico/congelador; Termómetro infravermelho; Termómetro de leitura instantânea; Termómetro de carne; Termómetro de forno; Termómetro de sonda sem fio; Outro